Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-15,238
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Contractors Certification and System Registration Act, the definitions in sections 81-15,240 to 81-15,244 shall be used.

Laws 2003, LB 94, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 57.